Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB575.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2710 heading, (a) and (c) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes are amended to read:§ 2710. [Ethnic] Hate-Based intimidation.(a) Offense defined.--A person commits the offense of [ethnic] hate-based intimidation if, with malicious intention toward the race, color, religion [or], national origin or intellectual or physical disability of another individual or group of individuals, he commits an offense under any other provision of this article or under Chapter 33 (relating to arson, criminal mischief and other property destruction) exclusive of section 3307 (relating to institutional vandalism) or under section 3503 (relating to criminal trespass) with 123456789101112131415161718 respect to such individual or his or her property or with respect to one or more members of such group or to their property.* * *(c) Definition.--As used in this section "malicious intention" means the intention to commit any act, the commission of which is a necessary element of any offense referred to in subsection (a) motivated by hatred toward the race, color, religion [or], national origin or intellectual or physical disability of another individual or group of individuals.Section 2. Section 8309(a) introductory paragraph of Title 42 is amended to read:§ 8309. Civil rights violations.(a) Redress for personal injury.--A person who incurs injury to his person or damage or loss to his property as a result of conduct described in 18 Pa.C.S. § 2710 (relating to [ethnic] hate-based intimidation) or 3307 (relating to institutional vandalism) shall have a right of action against the actor for injunction, damages or other appropriate civil or equitable relief. In the action, the issue of whether the defendant engaged in the conduct alleged shall be determined according to the burden of proof used in other civil actions for similar relief. The plaintiff may seek recovery for any of the following:* * *Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0575PN0575 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526